Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Treatment Program for Sexual Offenders

197.400.
Specialized treatment program for sexual offenders.

The department shall operate a specialized treatment program for sexual offenders, hereinafter referred to as the “program.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 63, effective July 14, 1992.

197.410.
Definitions of “sexual offender,” “eligible sexual offender,” and “department.”

A person is considered to be a “sexual offender” as used in this chapter when he or she has been adjudicated guilty of a sex crime, as defined in KRS 17.500, or any similar offense in another jurisdiction.

A sexual offender becomes an “eligible sexual offender” when the sentencing court or department officials, or both, determine that the offender:

Has demonstrated evidence of a mental, emotional, or behavioral disorder, but not active psychosis or an intellectual disability; and

Is likely to benefit from the program.

“Department” is the Department of Corrections.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 497, § 18, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 64, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 186, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 401, § 31, effective April 11, 2000; 2012, ch. 146, § 28, effective July 12, 2012.

197.420.
Department of Corrections to administer program — Treatment in inpatient and outpatient environments — Transfer — Staff — Data collection.

The department shall have the sole authority and responsibility for establishing by regulation the design of the specialized program created in KRS 197.400 to 197.440.

The program shall include diagnostic and treatment services in both inpatient and outpatient environments:

“Diagnostic services” shall include social and family histories, medical history, educational development, interpersonal development, criminal history, psychological screening, and pre-release evaluation;

“Treatment services” shall include individualized treatment plans to include individual, group, marital, and family counseling; psychoeducational courses to include sex education and victim personalization; and social skills development to include assertiveness training, stress management, and aggression management; and

The department shall have the authority and responsibility for establishing other educational and work programs necessary to complement treatment program objectives.

The department may transfer sexual offenders sentenced to its custody to the program and shall adopt administrative regulations concerning the transfer of sexual offenders.

All sexual offenders participating in the program may be housed separately from all other incarcerated inmates but shall be housed in accordance with the department’s standard classification system.

The treatment staff of the program shall minimumly consist of the following staff:

A program director who has at least a master’s degree in a recognized mental health field and six (6) years’ clinical experience or a doctoral degree in a recognized mental health field and four (4) years’ clinical experience. The director shall decide program policies and supervise all staff;

A clinical psychologist or a master’s degree level psychologist for each two hundred (200) participants. At least one (1) clinical psychologist shall be a member of the staff at all times; and

A counselor for each fifty (50) participants.

The department shall establish a system of data collection and program evaluation so as to allow study of participating sexual offenders and their offenses and to measure the impact of the program on recidivism.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 65, effective July 14, 1992.

197.430.
Agreements with public or private agencies.

The department may enter into agreements with public or private agencies in order to implement and operate the program created by KRS Chapter 197.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 66, effective July 14, 1992.

197.440.
Sexual offender’s communications which are privileged.

Communications made in the application for or in the course of a sexual offender’s diagnosis and treatment in the program between a sexual offender or member of the offender’s family and any employee of the department who is assigned to work in the program, or approved provider, as defined in KRS 17.500, shall be privileged from disclosure in any civil or criminal proceeding, other than proceedings to determine the sentence, unless the offender consents in writing to the disclosure or the communication is related to an ongoing criminal investigation. The privilege created by this section shall not extend to disclosures made for the purpose of determining whether the offender should continue to participate in the program. The provisions of KRS 620.030 shall not apply to a communication made, received, or overheard if the communication is made pursuant to this section. The offender shall be informed in writing of the limits of the privilege created in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 478, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 67, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 401, § 32, effective April 11, 2000; 2006, ch. 182, § 23, effective July 12, 2006.